Arkansas, session 2025, HB1823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:

CHAPTER 120
DISRUPT EXPLICIT FORGED IMAGES AND NONCONSENSUAL EDITS ACT OF 2025

4-120-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Disrupt Explicit
Forged Images and Nonconsensual Edits Act of 2025".

4-120-102. Definitions.
*ANS408*
03/18/2025 10:15:56 AM ANS408

HB1823
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Commercial pornographic content" means any material that is
subject to the record keeping requirements under 18 U.S.C. § 2257, as it
existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) "Consent" means an affirmative, conscious, competent, and
voluntary authorization made by an individual free from force, fraud,
misrepresentation, or coercion;
(3) "Digital forgery" means an intimate visual depiction of an
identifiable individual created through the use of software, machine
learning, artificial intelligence, or any other computer-generated or
technological means, including without limitation by adapting, modifying,
manipulating, or altering an authentic visual depiction, to appear to a
reasonable person to be indistinguishable from an authentic visual depiction
of the individual, regardless of whether the visual depiction indicates,
through a label or some other form of information published with the visual
depiction, that the visual depiction is not authentic;
(4) "Disclose" means to transfer, publish, distribute, or make
accessible;
(5) "Identifiable individual" means an individual whose body
appears in whole or in part in an intimate visual depiction and who is
identifiable by virtue of the person’s face, likeness, or other
distinguishing characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other
recognizable feature, or from information displayed in connection with the
intimate visual depiction;
(6) "Intimate visual depiction" means a visual depiction, as
that term is defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2256(5), as it existed on January 1,
2025, that:
(A) Depicts:
(i) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or
postpubescent female nipple of an identifiable individual;
(ii) The display or transfer of bodily sexual
fluids:
(a) On to any part of the body of an
identifiable individual; or
(b) From the body of an identifiable
individual; or
03/18/2025 10:15:56 AM ANS408

HB1823
(iii) An identifiable individual engaging in
sexually explicit conduct; and
(B) Includes any intimate visual depictions described
under subdivision (6)(A) of this section produced while the identifiable
individual was in a public place only if the individual did not:
(i) Voluntarily display the content depicted; or
(ii) Consent to the sexually explicit conduct
depicted; and
(7) "Sexually explicit conduct" means the same as defined in
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of 18 U.S.C. § 2256(2), as it existed on January 1,
2025.

4-120-103. Right of action — Rights on behalf of certain individuals.
(a) Except as provided in § 4-120-106, an identifiable individual:
(1) Whose intimate visual depiction is disclosed, in such a way
to affect interstate or foreign commerce or using any means or facility of
interstate or foreign commerce, without the consent of the identifiable
individual, where the disclosure was made by a person who knowingly or
recklessly disregards that the identifiable individual has not consented to
the disclosure, may bring a civil action against that person in an
appropriate district court of the State of Arkansas for relief under § 4-120-
105;
(2) Who is the subject of a digital forgery may bring a civil
action in an appropriate district court of the State of Arkansas for relief
under § 4-120-105 against any person that knowingly produced or possessed the
digital forgery with intent to disclose it, or knowingly disclosed or
solicited the digital forgery, if the:
(A) Identifiable individual did not consent to the
production, disclosure, solicitation, or possession;
(B) Person knowingly or recklessly disregarded that the
identifiable individual did not consent to the production, disclosure,
solicitation, or possession; and
(C) Production, disclosure, solicitation, or possession
affects interstate or foreign commerce or uses any means or facility of
interstate or foreign commerce; and
(3) Who is the subject of a digital forgery may bring a civil
03/18/2025 10:15:56 AM ANS408

HB1823
action in an appropriate district court of the State of Arkansas for relief
under § 4-120-105 against any person that knowingly produced the digital
forgery if the:
(A) Identifiable individual did not consent to the
production;
(B) Person knowingly or recklessly disregarded that the
identifiable individual did not consent to the production; and
(C) Production affects interstate or foreign commerce or
uses any means or facility of interstate or foreign commerce.
(b)(1) If an identifiable individual is under eighteen (18) years of
age, incompetent, incapacitated, or deceased, then the legal guardian of the
identifiable individual or representative of the identifiable individual’s
estate, another family member, or any other person appointed by the court as
a suitable representative may assume the identifiable individual's rights
under this chapter.
(2) The defendant shall not be named as the representative or
guardian under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

4-120-104. Consent.
For purposes of a civil action under § 4-120-103(a), the fact that the
identifiable individual:
(1) Consented to the creation of the intimate visual depiction
or digital forgery shall not establish that the person consented to its
disclosure, solicitation, or possession; and
(2) Disclosed the intimate visual depiction or digital forgery
to someone else shall not establish that the person consented to the further
disclosure, solicitation, or possession of the intimate visual depiction or
digital forgery by the person alleged to have violated § 4-120-103.

4-120-105. Relief — Preservation of privacy.
(a) In a civil action filed under this chapter:
(1) An identifiable individual may recover:
(A) The actual damages sustained by the defendant or
liquidated damages in the amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars
($150,000); and
(B) The cost of the action, including reasonable
03/18/2025 10:15:56 AM ANS408

HB1823
attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred; and
(2) The court may, in addition to any other relief available at
law, order equitable relief, including without limitation a temporary
restraining order, a preliminary injunction, or a permanent injunction
ordering the defendant, including third parties, to cease displaying or
disclosing of the intimate visual depiction or digital forgery of the
identifiable individual or plaintiff.
(b) In a civil action filed under this chapter, the court may issue an
order to protect the privacy of a plaintiff, including without limitation by:
(1) Permitting the plaintiff to use a pseudonym;
(2) Requiring the parties to redact the personal identifying
information of the plaintiff from any public filing or to file the documents
under seal; and
(3) Issuing a protective order for purposes of discovery, which
may include an order indicating that any intimate visual depiction or digital
forgery shall remain in the care, custody, and control of the court.

4-120-106. Exceptions.
An identifiable individual may not bring an action for relief under
this chapter relating to:
(1) An intimate visual depiction or digital forgery that is
commercial pornographic content, unless that content was produced by force,
fraud, misrepresentation, or coercion of the identifiable individual;
(2) A disclosure made in good faith:
(A) To a law enforcement officer or agency;
(B) As part of a legal proceeding;
(C) As part of medical education, diagnosis, or treatment;
or
(D) In the reporting or investigation of:
(i) Unlawful content; or
(ii) Unsolicited or unwelcome conduct;
(3) A matter of public concern or public interest; or
(4) A disclosure reasonably intended to assist the identifiable
individual.

4-120-107. Statute of limitations.
03/18/2025 10:15:56 AM ANS408

HB1823
Any action commenced under this chapter shall be barred unless the
complaint is filed not later than ten (10) years from the later of:
(1) The date on which the identifiable individual reasonably
discovers the violation that forms the basis for the claim; or
(2) The date on which the identifiable individual reaches
eighteen (18) years of age.

4-120-108. Duplicative recovery barred.
Relief shall not be ordered under § 4-120-105 against a person who is
subject to a judgment under 18 U.S.C. § 2255, as it existed on January 1,
2025, for the same conduct involving the same identifiable individual and the
same intimate visual depiction or digital forgery.
























03/18/2025 10:15:56 AM ANS408